Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-201
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-201 to 38-213 shall be known and may be cited as the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act.

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 36;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-17,131;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 140;

Laws 2022, LB905, § 1.